Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle A. General Provisions.

§ 23-15-391.
Use of optical mark reading equipment or direct recording electronic voting equipment; use of paper ballot for special, municipal or runoff elections when determined to be less expensive.

The board of supervisors of each county and the governing authorities of each municipality shall use optical mark reading equipment or direct recording electronic voting equipment that complies with the specifications provided by law. The election commissioners may conduct special and municipal elections, as well as any necessary runoff elections, by paper ballot when the election commissioners determine that administration of an election by paper ballot will be less expensive than administration of the same election by optical mark reading equipment or direct recording electronic voting equipment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 117; Laws, 2005, ch. 534, § 15; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 86, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-393.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 194, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-393. [Laws, 2005, ch. 534, § 17, eff June 6, 2005 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section.)]